Utah statutes.
75-7-808.   Recordkeeping and identification of trust property.
(1)  A trustee shall keep adequate records of the administration of the trust.
(2)  A trustee shall keep trust property separate from the trustee's own
property.
(3)  Except as otherwise provided in Subsection (4), a trustee shall cause the
trust property to be designated so that the interest of the trust, to the
extent feasible, appears in records maintained by a party other than a trustee
or beneficiary.
(4)  If the trustee maintains records clearly indicating the respective
interests, a trustee may invest as a whole the property of two or more
separate trusts.
